Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2402
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the
Postsecondary Institution Act are to ensure that minimum standards of operation
are met by both private and out-of-state postsecondary institutions operating
in Nebraska and to provide for consumer protection for students who enroll
in higher education programs in this state.

Laws 2011, LB637, § 2.